Washington statutes.
RCW 41.40.220

Allowance on retirement for duty disability—Before sixty.

Upon retirement for disability, as provided in RCW 41.40.200, a member who has not attained age sixty shall receive the following benefits, subject to the provisions of RCW 41.40.310 and 41.40.320:

(1) A disability retirement pension of two-thirds of his or her average final compensation to his or her attainment of age sixty, subject to the provisions of RCW 41.40.310. The disability retirement pension provided by the employer shall not exceed forty-two hundred dollars per annum, and

(2) Upon attainment of age sixty, the disabled member shall receive a service retirement allowance as provided in RCW 41.40.210. The department shall grant the disabled member membership service for the period of time prior to age sixty he or she was out of such service due to disability.

(3) During the period a disabled member is receiving a disability pension, as provided for in subsection (1) of this section, his or her contributions to the employees' savings fund shall be suspended and his or her balance in the employees' savings fund, standing to his or her credit as of the date his or her disability pension is to begin, shall remain in the employees' savings fund. If the disabled member should die before attaining age sixty, while a disability beneficiary, upon receipt by the department of proper proof of death, the member's accumulated contributions standing to his or her credit in the employees' savings fund, shall be paid to the member's estate, or such person or persons, trust, or organization as he or she shall have nominated by written designation duly executed and filed with the department. If there is no designated person or persons still living at the time of the member's death, the accumulated contributions standing to the member's credit in the employees' savings fund shall be paid to his or her surviving spouse, or if there is no surviving spouse, then to the member's legal representative.

[ 1995 c 144 s 2; 1991 c 35 s 81; 1972 ex.s. c 151 s 9; 1971 ex.s. c 271 s 8; 1961 c 291 s 7; 1953 c 200 s 12; 1949 c 240 s 16; 1947 c 274 s 23; Rem. Supp. 1949 s 11072-23.]

NOTES:

Intent—1991 c 35: See note following RCW 41.26.005.

Severability—1971 ex.s. c 271: See note following RCW 41.32.260.